Massachusetts, session 194th, H2683.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 48 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 90 the 
following section: 
Section 91: The Department of Fire Services shall recognize firefighters who have 
completed twenty years of service within the state of Massachusetts to be considered for the 
designation of “Legacy Firefighter.” Additionally, firefighters who cannot complete 20 years of 
service due to premature medical retirement shall also be considered for the designation. It shall 
be the responsibility of the individual to apply for this designation. Eligible individuals shall 
provide a notarized letter (hereafter referred to as “Certificate of Service”) verifying their 
completion of twenty or more years of service from the city, town, or department or combination 
thereof in which they served in order to be considered for the designation. Additionally, eligible 

of 2 11 members’ Certificate of Service shall necessarily include verification of a clean conduct record 
with the department in which they completed their years of service in order to become a recipient 
of the “Legacy Firefighter” designation. 
Recipients of the “Legacy Firefighter” designation shall receive: (1) A certificate issued 
by the Department of Fire Services honoring them as a “Legacy Firefighter,” (2) a campaign 
ribbon or like insignia officially recognizing them as such, and (3) upon their passing, a 
medallion emblazoned with the same design as previously mentioned to be situated at their place 
of rest.